src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/ca.dic
abundar/CY
acamussatge/EVY
acomodatiu/EVY
acrob tic/EVY
adduir /MNZ
adjudicatari/EVY
admet/CSZ
admetent/CR
admetia/OZ
admetr /TZ
admet s/PZ
adorm/CUZ
adunat/EVY
aferrant/CEVY
agarberat/EVY
agraner/EVY
ajagu s/QZ
ajudat/EVY
ajup/CUZ
alabat/CESVYZ
alabatent/CR
alabatia/OZ
alabatr /TZ
alabat s/PZ
albar /GVY
alentir /MNZ
allargada/EVY
allunament/EVY
amanyogada/EVY
amarradora/EVY
amuntegament/EVY
am /GVY
animosa/EVY
annalista/EVY
antir bic/EVY
antodi/EVY
apicular/EVY
apoc rpica/EVY
aprehendr /TZ
aprenent/CERVY
aprenia/OZ
aq  fuga/EVY
arengador/EVY
arquitecta/EVY
arremet/CSZ
arremet s/PZ
arrodonir /MNZ
arromangada/EVY
arrup/CUZ
ar lica/EVY
assegu s/QZ
assenyalada/EVY
astomatosa/EVY
atendr /TZ
atenyent/CR
atenyia/OZ
atribolada/EVY
at n/CSZ
autocompadir /MNZ
avantvotaci /GVY
aviadora/EVY
barbull/CEU
bat s/P
bestragu s/Q
bestraur /T
bevent/CER
bevia/O
bot/CES
brum/CEU
brunz/CU
buixir /MN
bull/CEU
cab s/P
caldr /T
calent/CFR
carvenia/O
cern/CS
circumscrigu s/Q
cloent/CR
colia/O
colltorc s/P
colltor /CS
combatent/CER
combatr /T
comet s/P
commogu s/Q
commovia/O
compareix/CS
competir /MN
complaent/CER
componia/O
comprengu s/Q
compromet/CS
comprometent/CR
comprometr /T
compromet s/P
conclo a/O
condorm/CU
coneix/CS
confongu s/Q
consent/CU
constreny s/P
consum/CEU
contorcent/CR
contorcer /T
contrabat s/P
contreia/O
contribuir /MN
conviu/CS
corfongu s/Q
corrompent/CR
corrompr /T
corromp s/P
creia/O
cresqu s/Q
cruix/CIU
cull/CU
cus/CU
debat/CES
debat s/P
decreix s/P
defendr /T
degu s/Q
demetent/CR
demolir /MN
dequeia/O
desacull/CU
desatengu s/Q
desat n/CS
descompondr /T
descompromet s/P
desconeixent/CER
descregu s/Q
descreia/O
desembravir /MN
desenlletgir /MN
desent n/CS
desment/CU
desobstruir /MN
despengu s/Q
desplaur /T
desprenent/CR
destorcia/O
destorc s/P
desvisqu s/Q
desviu/CS
difondr /T
diluir /MN
distenent/CR
distengu s/Q
distorcia/O
distorc s/P
dol/CES
dorm/CU
eixam/EVY
elidir /MNZ
embargolada/EVY
embascat/EVY
emmagrir /MNZ
empallegament/EVY
empenyer /TZ
empeny s/PZ
empleada/EVY
emprengu s/QZ
empudentir /MNZ
encalentida/EVY
encenent/CR
enclo a/OZ
endemesa/EVY
endenyada/EVY
endolcir /MNZ
engallir /MNZ
engarrofat/EVY
enllaminir /MNZ
enlle dora/EVY
enrinxada/EVY
enrobustir /MNZ
entorpir /MNZ
entrebat/CSZ
entrebat s/PZ
entrelluscat/EVY
entreplogu s/QZ
entreplour /TZ
entresent/CUZ
entresolc/EVY
envestir /MNZ
esbat s/PZ
esbombolat/EVY
esbucat/EVY
escaient/CERVY
escarnir /MNZ
escometia/OZ
escridada/EVY
escriu/CSZ
escruix/CUZ
escull/CEUVYZ
escup/CUZ
esf nter/EVY
esmuny/CUZ
espellifada/EVY
espellir /MNZ
espeny s/PZ
espunyat/EVY
estendr /TZ
estengu s/QZ
estenografia/DEVY
estorc s/PZ
estupre/EVY
esvanir /MNZ
evitern/EVY
excloent/CERVY
exclo a/OZ
extreta/EVY
extreu/CSZ
extrudir /MNZ
fengu s/Q
feny s/P
fondr /T
fum s/P
funy/CU
garfir /MN
gruny/CEU
hauent/CR
hauia/OZ
heli fila/EVY
heu s/PZ
homol gic/EVY
hora/EVY
inclou/CSZ
incomprensibilitat/EY
inefica /IVY
infligir /MNZ
inscrigu s/QZ
instrumentaci /GY
interrompr /TZ
investir /MNZ
jaient/CER
jeia/EO
malentengu s/Q
malent n/CS
malmet s/P
malprendr /T
mamprengu s/Q
mamprenia/O
manumetent/CR
marfon/CS
ment/CEU
mereixer /T
met s/P
mogu s/Q
muny/CU
negligir /MN
nomia/O
obrada/EVY
obturada/EVY
ofen/CSZ
ofenent/CR
olgu s/QZ
ometr /TZ
ornitol gica/EVY
orquestrada/EVY
perbull/CU
perceb s/P
percudir /MN
percut/CU
perdia/O
pernabatent/CR
pertany/CS
pertany s/P
perviur /T
plogu s/Q
ponia/O
prenent/CR
prescriu/CS
pressent/CU
pretendr /T
pretengu s/Q
prorrompia/O
prorromp s/P
puny/CEU
raent/CER
ragu s/Q
readmet/CS
readmetr /T
rebevia/O
rebordonir /MN
reb s/P
recaient/CR
recaigu s/Q
recompondr /T
reconegu s/Q
reconeix/CS
recull/CEU
reescrivia/O
remetent/CR
remogu s/Q
remordir /MN
remour /T
repr n/CS
responia/O
ressent/CU
retonent/CR
retorc s/P
retraur /T
retreu/CS
retrovengu s/Q
retrovenia/O
retruny/CEU
revivint/CR
romandr /T
romp/CS
romp s/P
rugir /MN
sent/CU
sobrecreixia/O
sobreentengu s/Q
sobreprenent/CR
sobreseur /T
sobresurt/CU
sobreval/CS
somovia/O
somrigu s/Q
sostraient/CR
sotaescriur /T
sotbat/CS
temia/O
tem s/P
tolent/CR
tondr /T
tor /CS
tragu s/Q
transgredir /MN
transmetia/O
transmet s/P
trement/CER
ullprendr /TZ
val/CES
